Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,116
Existing health maintenance organization; application.

Any health maintenance organization which has not received a certificate of authority to operate as a health maintenance organization under prior law as of July 10, 1990, shall submit an application for a certificate of authority within ninety days of such date. Each such applicant may continue to operate until the director acts upon the application. If the application is denied, the applicant shall be treated as a health maintenance organization whose certificate of authority has been revoked.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 25.